Utah statutes.
59-1-1309.   Penalty may be waived, reduced, or compromised for reasonable cause.

Upon making a record of its actions, and upon reasonable cause shown, the commission may waive, reduce, or compromise a penalty imposed by this part.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2006 General Session

